Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
PART 4 Holding of Additional Offices by Nonelective State
Officers or Employees

45-10-70.
Holding office in political subdivision, political party, or political organization by nonelective state officers or employees.

No rules or regulations of any state agency, department, or authority shall prohibit nonelective officers or employees of this state from offering for or holding any elective or appointive office of a political subdivision of this state or any elective or appointive office of a political party or political organization of this state, provided that the office is not full time and does not conflict with the performance of the official duties of the person as a state employee.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-10-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 427, § 1.